en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Watercraft Storage Racks: Boat Storage Racks; Personal Watercraft Storage Racks; Water Sport Board Storage Racks; Watercraft Carts & Dollies
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Vandens transporto priemonių stelažai: Valčių stelažai; Asmeninių vandens transporto priemonių laikymo stovai; Vandens sporto lentų stelažai; Vandens transporto vežimėliai ir transportavimo stovai
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Suporte para armazenamento de jet-skis: Suporte para armazenamento de barcos; Prateleiras de armazenamento para motos aquáticas; Suporte para armazenamento de pranchas de esportes aquáticos; Carrinhos e bases com rodas para embarcações
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Ράφια αποθήκευσης σκαφών: Ράφια αποθήκευσης βαρκών; Βάσεις αποθήκευσης ατομικών σκαφών αναψυχής; Ράφια αποθήκευσης σανίδων σπορ; Καρότσια και βάσεις μεταφοράς σκαφών
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 선박 보관 선반: 보트 보관대; 개인용 워터크래프트 보관 랙; 수상 스포츠 보드 보관대; 워터크래프트 카트 및 돌리
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Racks de stockage de bateaux: Racks de stockage pour bateaux; Supports de rangement pour motomarines; Porte-planches; Chariots et remorques pour embarcations
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Stojany na uskladnění lodí: Stojany na lodě; Stojany na osobní vodní plavidla; Stojany na prkna na vodní sporty; Vozíky a podvozky pod vodní plavidla
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Stojaki na jednostki pływające: Stojaki na łodzie; Regały do przechowywania skuterów wodnych; Stojaki na deski do pływania; Wózki i platformy na sprzęt wodny
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 船舶存放架: 船只存放架; 个人摩托艇储物架; 水上运动板存放架; 船艇推车与拖车
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Стойки за съхранение на плавателни съдове: Стойки за съхранение на лодки; Стелажи за съхранение на лични водни плавателни съдове; Стойки за дъски за водни спортове; Колички и стойки за водни плавателни съдове
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Scaffali per lo stoccaggio di natanti: Scaffali per stoccaggio barche; Scaffali di stoccaggio per moto d'acqua; Rastrelliere per lo stoccaggio di tavole per sport acquatici; Carrelli per moto d'acqua
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Opbergrekken voor vaartuigen: Opslagrekken voor boten; Opbergrekken voor waterscooters; Opbergrekken voor waterboards; Karren en trolleys voor vaartuigen
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Su Taşıtı Saklama Rafları: Kayık Saklama Rafları; Kişisel deniz aracı depolama rafları; Su Sporu Tahtası Saklama Rafları; Deniz aracı taşıma arabaları ve tekerlekli altlıkları
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Suportes de armazenamento de embarcações: Suportes de armazenamento de barcos; Suportes de armazenamento para motas de água; Suportes de armazenamento de pranchas de desportos aquáticos; Carrinhos e zorras para embarcações
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Ablagen für Wasserfahrzeuge: Halterungen für Boote; Aufbewahrungsgestelle für Personal Watercrafts; Halterungen für Boards; Wagen & Transportrollen für Wasserfahrzeuge
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Кронштейны для хранения лодок и досок: Кронштейны для хранения лодок; Стеллажи для хранения гидроциклов; Кронштейны для хранения досок для водных видов спорта; Тележки для гидроциклов и лодок
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Stojala za shranjevanje vodnih plovil: Stojala za shranjevanje čolnov; Stojala za shranjevanje vodnih skuterjev; Stojala za shranjevanje desk za vodne športe; Vozički za vodna plovila
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Lagringsstativer for vannfartøyer: Lagringsstativer for båter; Oppbevaringsstativer til vannscootere; Lagringsstativer for vannsportbrett; Traller og dollyer til vannscootere
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Soportes de almacenaje para embarcaciones: Estantes para almacenar embarcaciones; Estantes de almacenamiento para embarcaciones personales; Estantes para almacenar planchas para deportes acuáticos; Carros y plataformas con ruedas para embarcaciones
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Veneiden säilytystelineet: Veneen säilytystelineet; Vesijettien säilytystelineet; Vesiurheilulautojen säilytystelineet; Vesikulkuneuvojen kärryt ja alustat
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > ชั้นจัดเก็บยานพาหนะที่แล่นบนหรือในน้ำ: ชั้นจัดเก็บเรือ; ชั้นวางเรือส่วนบุคคล; ชั้นเก็บกระดานโต้คลื่น; รถลากและดอลลี่สำหรับเรือ
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Stalci za pohranu plovila: Stalci za pohranu čamca; Stalci za pohranu osobnih plovila; Stalci za pohranu dasaka za vodene sportove; Kolica za plovila
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Opbevaring til fartøjer: Racks til bådopbevaring; Opbevaringsstativer til vandscootere; Racks til opbevaring af vandsportsudstyr; Vogne og trækvogne til fartøjer
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Vízijárműtároló állványok: Csónaktároló állványok; Jetski-tárolóállványok; Vízisportdeszkatároló állványok; Vízi jármű-szállító kocsik
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Suporturi de depozitare pentru ambarcațiuni: Suporturi de depozitare pentru bărci; Rafturi de depozitare pentru ambarcațiuni personale; Suporturi de depozitare pentru plăci pentru sporturi nautice; Cărucioare pentru ambarcațiuni
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Stojany na skladovanie plavidiel: Stojany na skladovanie lodí; Stojany na vodné skútre; Stojany na skladovanie dosiek na vodné športy; Košíky a vozíky pre plavidlá
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 船艇置放架: 船隻收納架; 水上摩托車存放架; 水上運動板收納架; 船艇推車與台車
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Giá cất tàu thuyền: Giá cất giữ thuyền; Giá để phương tiện dưới nước cá nhân; Giá lưu giữ ván chơi thể thao dưới nước; Xe kéo và xe đẩy phương tiện dưới nước
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Förvaringsställningar för vattenfarkoster: Förvaringsställningar för båtar; Förvaringsställ för vattenskotrar; Förvaringsställningar för vattensportbräden; Vagnar och trallor för vattenskotrar
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ボート・水上バイク用収納ラック: ボート収納ラック; PWC用収納ラック; ウォータースポーツ用ボード収納ラック; ウォータークラフト用カート・台車